Oklahoma, session 2026, SB456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Abolition of


Abortion Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:



Req. No. 1463 Page 1


Acknowledging the sanctity of innocent human life, created in


the image of God, the purpose of this act is to:


1. Follow the United States Constitution, which requires that


“no state...shall deny to any person within its jurisdiction the


equal protection of the laws”;


2. Fulfill such constitutional requirement by protecting the


lives of preborn persons with the same criminal and civil laws


protecting the lives of born persons by repealing provisions that


permit willful prenatal homicide or assault;


3. Protect pregnant mothers from being pressured to abort by


repealing provisions that may otherwise allow a person to direct,


advise, encourage, or solicit a mother to abort her child; and


4. Ensure that all persons potentially subject to such laws are


entitled to due process protections.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 691, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 691. A. Homicide is the killing of one human being by


another.


B. As used in this section, “human being” includes an unborn


child, as defined in Section 1-730 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


C. Homicide shall not include:





Req. No. 1463 Page 2


1. Acts which cause the death of an unborn child if those acts


were committed during a legal abortion to which the pregnant woman


consented; or


2. Acts acts which are committed pursuant to the usual and


customary standards of medical practice during diagnostic testing or


therapeutic treatment.


D. Under no circumstances shall the mother of the unborn child


be prosecuted for causing the death of the unborn child unless the


mother has committed a crime that caused the death of the unborn


child.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 696 of Title 21, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This chapter applies even where the victim is an unborn


child.


B. Enforcement where the victim is an unborn child is subject


to the same presumptions, defenses, justifications, laws of parties,


immunities, and clemencies as would apply when the victim is a


person who had been born alive.


C. This chapter shall not apply to:


1. The undertaking of life-saving procedures to save the life


of the mother when accompanied by reasonable steps to save the life


of the unborn child; or


2. A spontaneous miscarriage.

Req. No. 1463 Page 3


D. This section prevails over other law to the extent of any


conflict.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 156, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 156. A. A person is entitled to assert duress as a


defense if that person committed a prohibited act or omission


because of a reasonable belief that there was imminent danger of


death or great bodily harm from another upon oneself, ones one’s


spouse, or ones one’s child.


B. Even where the charge is murder, the provisions of this


section shall apply if the victim is an unborn child and the


defendant is the child’s mother.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 650.12 of Title 21, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This chapter applies even where the victim is an unborn


child.


B. Enforcement where the victim is an unborn child is subject


to the same presumptions, defenses, justifications, laws of parties,


immunities, and clemencies as would apply where the victim is a


person who had been born alive.


C. This chapter shall not apply to:





Req. No. 1463 Page 4


1. The undertaking of life-saving procedures to save the life


of the mother when accompanied by reasonable steps to save the life


of the unborn child; or


2. A spontaneous miscarriage.


D. This section prevails over other law to the extent of any


conflict.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 1053, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1053. A. When the death of one is caused by the


wrongful act or omission of another, the personal representative of


the former may maintain an action therefor against the latter, or


his or her personal representative if he or she is also deceased, if


the former might have maintained an action, had he or she lived,


against the latter, or his or her representative, for an injury for


the same act or omission. The action must be commenced within two


(2) years.


B. The damages recoverable in actions for wrongful death as


provided in this section shall include the following:


1. Medical and burial expenses, which shall be distributed to


the person or governmental agency as defined in Section 5051.1 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes who paid these expenses, or to the


decedent’s estate if paid by the estate. The provisions of this


paragraph shall not apply to the cost of an abortion in actions


maintained pursuant to subsection F of this section;

Req. No. 1463 Page 5


2. The loss of consortium and the grief of the surviving


spouse, which shall be distributed to the surviving spouse;


3. The mental pain and anguish suffered by the decedent, which


shall be distributed to the surviving spouse and children, if any,


or next of kin in the same proportion as personal property of the


decedent. For the purposes of actions maintained pursuant to


subsection F of this section, “next of kin” as used in this


paragraph shall mean the parent or grandparent who maintained the


action as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection F of this


section;


4. The pecuniary loss to the survivors based upon properly


admissible evidence with regard thereto including, but not limited


to, the age, occupation, earning capacity, health habits, and


probable duration of the decedent’s life, which must inure to the


exclusive benefit of the surviving spouse and children, if any, or


next of kin, and shall be distributed to them according to their


pecuniary loss. For the purposes of actions maintained pursuant to


subsection F of this section, “next of kin” next of kin as used in


this paragraph shall mean the parent or grandparent who maintained


the action as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection F of this


section; and


5. The grief and loss of companionship of the children and


parents of the decedent, which shall be distributed to them


according to their grief and loss of companionship.

Req. No. 1463 Page 6


C. In proper cases, as provided by Section 9.1 of Title 23 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, punitive or exemplary damages may also be


recovered against the person proximately causing the wrongful death


or the person’s representative if such person is deceased. Such


damages, if recovered, shall be distributed to the surviving spouse


and children, if any, or next of kin in the same proportion as


personal property of the decedent. For the purposes of actions


maintained pursuant to subsection F of this section, “next of kin”


next of kin as used in this paragraph shall mean the parent or


grandparent who maintained the action as provided for in paragraph 3


of subsection F of this section.


D. Where the recovery is to be distributed according to a


person’s pecuniary loss or loss of companionship, the judge shall


determine the proper division.


E. The above-mentioned distributions shall be made after the


payment of legal expenses and costs of the action.


F. 1. The provisions of this section shall also be available


for the death of an unborn person as defined in Section 1-730 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to acts which


cause the death of an unborn person in utero if:


a. the physician who performed the abortion or the


referring physician fails to obtain and document the


voluntary and informed consent of the pregnant woman

Req. No. 1463 Page 7


pursuant to Section 1-738.2 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


b. the pregnant woman withdraws her consent to the


abortion prior to performance of the abortion,


c. the pregnant woman undergoes the abortion due to


coercion from a third party,


d. the physician fails to obtain and document proof of


age demonstrating that the pregnant woman is not a


minor, or, in the case of a minor, fails to obtain:


(1) parental consent to the abortion pursuant to


Section 1-740.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes,


(2) proof that the pregnant woman, although a minor,


is emancipated, or


(3) judicial authorization of the abortion without


parental notification pursuant to Section 1-740.3


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


e. the physician who performed the abortion causes the


woman physical or psychological harm, the possibility


of which she did not foresee or was not informed of at


the time of her consent,


f. the physician who performed the abortion fails to


screen the pregnant woman and document such screening


for risk factors associated with a heightened risk of

Req. No. 1463 Page 8


adverse consequences from abortion which a reasonably


prudent physician would screen for,


g. the physician fails to screen the pregnant woman and


document such screening for physical or psychological


impairment of judgment due to factors including, but


not limited to, drugs, alcohol, illness or fatigue,


h. the physician fraudulently induces the pregnant woman


to obtain the abortion or gives misleading or false


information in response to a pregnant woman’s inquiry,


or


i. there exist any other circumstances which violate


state law.


The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply


to cases in which a physician licensed to practice medicine in this


state attempts, in a reasonably prudent manner, to prevent the death


of an unborn person or a pregnant woman.


3. A parent or grandparent of the deceased unborn person is


entitled to maintain an action against the physician person who


caused the death of an unborn person under the conditions provided


by subparagraphs a through i of paragraph 2 of this subsection;


provided, however, the parent or grandparent may not maintain such


action if the parent or grandparent coerced the mother of the unborn


person to abort the unborn person.



Req. No. 1463 Page 9


4. Liability for wrongful death by the a physician under this


section shall not be waived by the pregnant woman prior to


performance of the abortion. A physician shall not request, orally,


on a written form or in any other manner, that the pregnant woman


waive the liability of the physician for wrongful death related to


the abortion as a condition of performing an abortion.


5. Under no circumstances shall the mother of the unborn person


be found liable for causing the death of the unborn person unless


the mother has committed a crime that caused the death of the unborn


person.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act is prospective only and shall not apply to conduct


committed prior to the effective date of this act.


SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1463 DC 1/19/2025 5:36:44 AM









Req. No. 1463 Page 10